Wyoming, session 2025, HB0095.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-227 is created to read:

9-4-227. School generational account.

HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
(a) The school generational account within the
permanent land fund, created by W.S. 9-4-310(a)(xiii), is a
permanent fund containing monies that shall be inviolate as
perpetual school funds. The account is intended to increase
revenues by taking advantage of the compounding effect of
money and utilizing long-term investment strategies that
have historically provided higher investment returns.

(b) Investment of the school generational account
shall be in accordance with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through
(e) and W.S. 9-4-716, except that W.S. 9-4-716(e) shall
apply to require that the school generational account be
invested so that the overall risk profile of the account's
investments shall not materially exceed the risk profile of
a reference portfolio that consists of eighty-five percent
(85%) private equity and fifteen percent (15%) private
credit investments. In adopting investment policy
statements for the school generational account under W.S.
9-4-716, the board shall seek to preserve the balance of
the account in a manner that strives for the highest
possible risk-adjusted total net return consistent with an
appropriate level of safety and liquidity, giving
consideration to the account's potential extended
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
investment period and the extended period during which
monies in the account may be ineligible for withdrawal.

(c) At times determined by the state treasurer,
earnings from investment of the school generational account
shall be deposited in the school generational income
account within the permanent land income fund. Earnings
deposited in the school generational income account shall
be appropriated and expended only pursuant to this section.

(d) All appropriations and other monies directed to
the school generational account shall be credited to the
account by the state treasurer. To further the purposes of
the school generational account and unless contrary to law,
earnings from the investment of monies in the account shall
be deposited into the school generational income account
but shall not be expended from the income account less than
twenty-two (22) years after the first date that monies are
credited to the school generational account.

(e) No earnings from the school generational account
that are deposited into the school generational income
account shall be expended from the school generational
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
income account except upon legislative appropriation and
then only for purposes authorized under the public school
foundation program. Any appropriation of monies in the
school generational income account on and after the date
appropriations are allowed under subsection (d) of this
section shall be executed in consultation with the state
treasurer and in a manner that allows for the prudent
generation of the appropriated earnings giving due regard
to the consequences of realizing earnings from the types of
investments in which the school generational account is
invested.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-203(a)(xiii), 9-4-305(b),
9-4-310(a) by creating a new paragraph (xiii), (b) and (c)
by creating a new paragraph (vi) and 9-4-716(e) are amended
to read:

9-4-203. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-202 through
9-4-226 9-4-227.
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278

9-4-305. Disposition of state land revenue.

(b) Proceeds from the sale of state lands, mineral
royalties and any money designated by the Wyoming
constitution or Wyoming statutes as collected shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the
proper accounts within the permanent land fund. As
authorized by article 7, section 2 of the Wyoming
constitution, thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%)
of the mineral royalties received from the lease of any
school lands shall be deposited into the public school
foundation program account. To the extent constitutionally
permissible and notwithstanding any other provision of law,
at the end of every fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
transfer to the corpus of each account within the permanent
land fund, except the common school account and school
generational account, from the income earned on the
corresponding account within the permanent land fund, to
the extent available, an amount as provided by this
subsection. In determining the amount to be withheld, the
state treasurer shall calculate the fiscal year beginning
balance and ignore any appropriations made from the account
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
within that fiscal year. For the fiscal year 2000, he shall
transfer an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the
inflation rate for the previous twelve (12) month period as
determined by the department of administration and
information multiplied by the beginning balance of each
permanent land fund account, except the common school
account. At the end of each succeeding fiscal year, the
state treasurer shall increase the amount to be multiplied
by that year's inflation rate by five percent (5%) until
such time as the multiplier reaches one hundred percent
(100%) of the inflation rate, and then multiply that amount
by the beginning balance of each permanent land fund
account, except the common school account and school
generational account.

9-4-310. Permanent land fund and land income fund
accounts.

(a) The following accounts within the permanent land
fund are established to account for revenue dedicated to
certain institutions or for certain purposes accruing from
grants of land contained in the Act of Admission or acts of
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
congress, or accruing from provisions of the Wyoming
constitution or Wyoming statutes:

(xiii) School generational account.

(b) No appropriation shall be made from the
agricultural college, common school, school generational or
university accounts within the permanent land fund.

(c) The following accounts within the permanent land
income fund are established to be expended as provided by
law:

(vi) School generational income account.

9-4-716. State investment policy; investment
consultant.

(e) In investing monies of a fund or account which
may be invested in stock of a corporation or other
equities, the overall risk profile of the investments,
excluding any specific public purpose investment authorized
or directed by the legislature, shall not materially exceed
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
the risk profile of a reference portfolio that consists of
seventy percent (70%) global equities and thirty percent
(30%) domestic fixed income investments. The state
treasurer after consultation with the investment funds
committee shall submit to the board the committee's
recommendations of specific benchmarks for the measurement
of the portfolio risk characteristics. The specific
benchmarks shall be determined by the board. Any provision
of law which restricts or expands the investment of a
specific fund or account to a greater degree than the
provisions of this subsection shall control over this
subsection.

Section 3. From any monies received by the state of
Wyoming from the sale of state school trust lands before
December 31, 2025, one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as becomes available,
is appropriated to the school generational account under
W.S. 9-4-227 and 9-4-310(a)(xiii), as created by section 1
of this act. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S.
9‑2‑1008, 9‑2‑1012(e) and 9-4-207, this appropriation shall
HB0095

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0278
remain in effect and not lapse or revert at the end of any
fiscal period except upon further legislative action.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0095